Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-103.1 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Oklahoma Statewide Health Platform Revolving Fund in Section
2 of this act shall be used exclusively to contract for and
implement a statewide, enterprise-wide, cloud-based communication,
and care coordination Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act (HIPAA)-compliant platform that:
1. Provides every licensed hospital, Emergency Management
Services (EMS) agency, and public health entity in the State of
Req. No. 16445 Page 1

Okla homa with real-time, HIPAA-compliant team alerting, live video
consultation, electrocardiogram (ECG) and image sharing, patient
channeling, and mass casualty and multiple casualty incident
management for time-sensitive emergencies including stroke, ST-
elevation myocardial infarction (STEMI), trauma, sepsis, cardiac
arrest, respiratory failure, pediatric emergencies, other general
emergencies, and natural disasters; and
2. Creates one unified operating platform connecting all
emergency response entities across the entire state.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-103.2 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury, a revolving fund
for the Oklahoma State Department of Health to be designated the
"Oklahoma Statewide Health Platform Revolving Fund". The fund shall
be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and
shall consist of all monies received by the Oklahoma State
Department of Health from state-appropriated funds, federal funds,
donations, grants, and contributions from any public or private
source and designated for the purpose set forth in this section.
All monies accruing to the credit of said fund are hereby
appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Oklahoma State
Department of Health for the purpose provided for in Section 1 of
this act. Expenditures from said fund shall be made upon warrants
Req. No. 16445 Page 2

issu ed by the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by
law with the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-16445 TJ 02/17/26














Req. No. 16445 Page 3